Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.265

Competitive bids—Inapplicability to certain agreements relating to water pollution control, solid waste handling facilities.

RCW 36.32.240, 36.32.250, and 36.32.260 do not apply to the selection of persons or entities to construct or develop water pollution control facilities or to provide water pollution control services under RCW 70A.140.040 or the selection of persons or entities to construct or develop solid waste handling facilities or to provide solid waste handling services under RCW 36.58.090.

[ 2021 c 65 s 25; 1989 c 399 s 8; 1987 c 436 s 9.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.